Hawaii statutes.
[§516‑204] University of Hawaii at
Manoa. The legislature identifies the creation of a sustainable affordable
development by or on land owned by or set aside to the University of Hawaii at
Manoa to be a matter of statewide concern because of the built-up nature of the
surrounding community. The University of Hawaii at Manoa shall not create a
sustainable affordable development by entering into any sustainable affordable
lease or by authorizing any land owned by or set aside to the University of
Hawaii at Manoa to be demised under a sustainable affordable lease prior to
enactment of a law specifically authorizing the University of Hawaii at Manoa
to enter into a sustainable affordable lease or to demise any land owned by or
set aside to the University of Hawaii at Manoa under a sustainable affordable
lease. [L 2005, c 197, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next